West Virginia, session 2026, HB4730.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-129a. Development of a continuum of independent living and transitional support services for youth aging out of foster care. (a) By January 1, 2027, the Department of Human Services shall develop and maintain a coordinated continuum of services and supports for all youth who are preparing to exit foster care or who have recently aged out of care. (b) The development process shall include, at a minimum, consultation with: (1) Representatives of contracted providers delivering independent living and transitional services across diverse geographic regions; and  (2) Individuals with lived experience in foster care; and community partners and stakeholders providing housing, employment, educational, and supportive services to transitioning youth. (c) The department shall ensure that the continuum of supports is in place prior to the youth exiting or aging-out of foster care, and that the continuum of supports has network adequacy for statewide coverage.(d) The department shall ensure that the continuum of supports includes program models designed to meet the differing levels of independence and supervision required by youth as they progress toward self-sufficiency.  (e) The continuum shall include, at minimum:(1) Three phases of supportive living arrangements providing on-site independent living, scattered site living arrangements and supportive independent living; and(2) Services to support youth to achieve self-sufficiency must include, at a minimum, services designed to improve practical and daily living skills, social and emotional skills, and education and career development skills. (f) The department shall, in collaboration with contracted providers, develop and implement a per diem rate structure for independent living and transitional youth services. The rate structure shall:(1) Account for the varying levels of supervision, staffing, and program intensity required to meet the individual needs of youth;(2) Be designed to maximize federal Title IV-E reimbursement until the age of 21; (3) Include an annual cost-of-living adjustment (COLA) for youth consistent with guidance issued by the Social Security Administration; (4) Be reviewed for sufficiency at least once every three years; (5) Be adjusted as necessary to ensure the adequacy and equity of reimbursement rates to support quality service delivery and provider sustainability;  (6) Include rate variability to account for fair market rent rates and assure quality staffing; and(7) Be inclusive of a monthly stipend paid directly to youth to cover basic costs needed for a safe dwelling when the youth achieves independent living. (g) Data collection and continuous quality improvement;(1) The department shall implement a Continuous Quality Improvement (CQI) process to evaluate the effectiveness, accessibility, and outcomes of independent living and transitional support services;  (2) The CQI process shall include: performance measures and outcome indicators addressing National Youth in Transition Database outcomes, including housing stability, employment, education, permanency connections, and overall well-being; mechanisms for obtaining input from youth participants and contracted providers; and (3) Starting December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, reports to Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Resources of aggregate findings and recommendations for system improvement and shall include reporting on the proportionate share of Title IV-E expenditures, Chafee education and training grants, and state dollars. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home